Hawaii statutes.
§302A-408 After-school and weekend
programs. The department and the appropriate county agencies may establish
and regulate programs of after-school and weekend community-school activities
for children, including but not limited to child-care programs, arts and
crafts, hula, ukulele, and other recreational projects, wherever feasible, at
public school and public park facilities. In addition to any appropriation of
public funds, reasonable fees established by the agencies operating the
programs may be collected from children enrolled, in the furtherance of
particular programs. The appropriate agencies may obtain from time to time the
services of persons in a voluntary or unpaid capacity, exempt from chapter 76,
as may be necessary for carrying out the purposes of this section, and may
regulate their duties, powers, and responsibilities when not otherwise provided
by law. Any person whose services have been so accepted, while engaged in the
performance of duty under this section, shall be deemed a state employee or an
employee of a political subdivision, as the case may be, in determining the
liability of the State or the political subdivision for the negligent acts of
these persons. [L 1996, c 89, pt of §2; am L 2000, c 253, §150; am L 2001, c
174, §1]

Cross References

Employees; criminal history record checks, see §302A-601.5.

Use of school facilities for recreational and community
purposes, see §302A-1148.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next